Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF544.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 1402HV (1) 91 ss/ns H.F. 544 Section 1. Section 68A.201, subsection 2, paragraphs a and 1 b, Code 2025, are amended to read as follows: 2 a. The name, purpose, mailing address, electronic mail 3 address, and telephone number of the committee. The committee 4 name shall not duplicate the name of another committee 5 organized under this section . For candidateâs committees 6 filing initial statements of organization on or after July 7 1, 1995, the candidateâs name shall be contained within the 8 committee name. 9 b. The name, mailing address, electronic mail address, and 10 position of the committee officers. 11 Sec. 2. Section 68A.201A, subsection 6, Code 2025, is 12 amended to read as follows: 13 6. The verified statement shall be filed by 4:30 in an 14 electronic format no later than 11:59 p.m. of the day the 15 filing is due. 16 Sec. 3. Section 68A.303, subsection 5, Code 2025, is amended 17 to read as follows: 18 5. A candidate, candidateâs committee, or any other person 19 shall not directly or indirectly receive or transfer campaign 20 funds with the intent of circumventing the requirements of this 21 section . A candidate for statewide or legislative office shall 22 not establish, direct, or maintain a political committee. 23 Sec. 4. Section 68A.401, subsection 1, paragraph a, Code 24 2025, is amended to read as follows: 25 a. A state statutory political committee, a county statutory 26 political committee, a political committee, and a candidateâs 27 committee shall file all statements and reports in an 28 electronic format by 4:30 no later than 11:59 p.m. of the day 29 the filing is due and according to rules adopted by the board. 30 Sec. 5. Section 68A.405, subsection 1, paragraph a, 31 subparagraph (3), Code 2025, is amended to read as follows: 32 (3) âPublished materialâ means any newspaper, magazine, 33 shopper, outdoor advertising facility, poster, direct mailing, 34 brochure, internet site, campaign sign, or any other form of 35 -1- LSB 1402HV (1) 91 ss/ns 1/ 3 H.F. 544 printed or electronic general public political advertising. 1 âPublished materialâ includes radio, television, video, or 2 motion picture internet advertising. 3 Sec. 6. Section 68B.32, subsection 3, Code 2025, is amended 4 to read as follows: 5 3. The board shall annually elect one member to serve as 6 the chairperson of the board and one member to serve as vice 7 chairperson. The vice chairperson shall act as the chairperson 8 in the absence or disability of the chairperson or in the 9 event of a vacancy in that office. The chairperson and vice 10 chairperson shall not be members of the same political party. 11